Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
William Johnson House

§ 39-5-81.
Purchase and restoration.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is hereby authorized and empowered to purchase and restore the William Johnson house, a “Mississippi Landmark,” in Natchez, Mississippi, when adequate funds for the purchase and restoration thereof are deposited in the Historic Properties Trust Fund herein created. The funds used for this purpose shall be drawn from those contributions to the trust fund which have been earmarked for the William Johnson House or which have been undesignated as to their use.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1987).